Utah statutes.
52-3-2.   Each day of violation a separate offense.

Each day any such person, father, mother, husband, wife, son, daughter, sister, brother, uncle, aunt, nephew, niece, first cousins, mother-in-law, father-in-law, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, son-in-law or daughter-in-law, is retained in office by any of said officials shall be regarded as a separate offense.

